Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4610
Conformance with farm unit conservation plan or soil-loss tolerance level; effect; cost-sharing assistance; availability; lack of cost-sharing assistance; effect.

(1) Any person owning or operating private agricultural, horticultural, or silvicultural lands who has a farm unit conservation plan approved by the district and is implementing and maintaining the plan in strict compliance with a conservation agreement or any person whose normal agricultural, horticultural, and silvicultural practices are in conformance with the applicable soil-loss tolerance level shall, for purposes of such land, be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of the Erosion and Sediment Control Act and any approved erosion and sediment control program.

(2) To prevent excess erosion and sediment from leaving the land due to any agricultural or nonagricultural land-disturbing activity, cost-sharing assistance may be available from any district. Such assistance may be used for any erosion or sediment control practice. The lack of available cost-sharing assistance does not offset the requirement that the owner and, if appropriate, the operator of such land comply with the terms of an approved plan of compliance or an administrative order.

Laws 1986, LB 474, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 594, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 24;

Laws 2015, LB206, § 5.